pt-BR: Nível de suporte do sutiã: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
ja: ブラサポートレベル: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
ru: Уровень поддержки бюстгальтера: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другой
fi: Rintaliivien tukitaso: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
hr-HR: Razina potpore grudnjaka: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
pt-PT: Nível de suporte do sutiã: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
de: BH-Unterstützungsgrad: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Stopnja podpore nedrčka: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
vi: Mức nâng của áo ngực: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
es: Nivel de soporte del sujetador: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
sv: BH-supportnivå: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
el: Επίπεδο στήριξης σουτιέν: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
da: BH-støtteniveau: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
th: ระดับการรองรับของบรา: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
ko: 브래지어 지지력 수준: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
lt-LT: Liemenėlės palaikymo lygis: Didelis; Mažas; Vidutinis; Kita
hu: A melltartó által nyújtott támasz szintje: Nagyfokú; Kisfokú; Közepes; Egyéb
ro-RO: Nivel de susținere sutien: Ridicat; Redus; Mediu; Altele
cs: Úroveň opory podprsenky: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
zh-CN: 胸罩支撑度: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň podpory podprsenky: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
tr: Sutyen destek seviyesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
nb: BH-støttenivå: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
bg-BG: Ниво на поддръжка на сутиена: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Други
nl: Ondersteuningsniveau bh: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
en: Bra support level: High; Low; Medium; Other
fr: Niveau de maintien du soutien-gorge: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
it: Livello di supporto del reggiseno: Alto; Basso; Medium; Altro
zh-TW: 胸罩支撐等級: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
pl: Poziom wsparcia biustonosza: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne